Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4048
Purpose; applicability.

(1) The Insurance Producers Licensing Act governs the qualifications and procedures for the licensing of insurance producers. The act is intended to improve efficiency, permit the use of new technology, and reduce costs associated with issuing and renewing insurance licenses.

(2) The act does not apply to excess and surplus lines agents and brokers licensed pursuant to the Surplus Lines Insurance Act except as provided in section 44-4054 and subsection (2) of section 44-4063.

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 2.

Surplus Lines Insurance Act, see section 44-5501.